California statutes. Water Code
(b) For the purposes of preparing the guidelines, the state board shall consider the consensus recommendations adopted by the public advisory group convened pursuant to Section 13191.

(c) The guidelines shall be finalized not later than January 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   Effective April 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

13193.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Collection system owner or operator” means the public or private entity having legal authority over the operation and maintenance of, or capital improvements to, the sewer collection system.

(2) “GIS” means Geographic Information System.

(b) On or before January 1 of a year in which the Legislature has appropriated sufficient funds for this purpose, the state board, in consultation with representatives of cities, counties, cities and counties, special districts, public
 interest groups, the State Department of Public Health, and the regional boards shall develop a uniform overflow event report form to be used for reporting of sanitary sewer system overflows as required in subdivision (c). This event report form shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The cause of the overflow. The cause shall be specifically identified, unless there is an ongoing investigation, in which case it shall be identified immediately after completion of the investigation. The cause shall be identified, at a minimum, as blockage, infrastructure failure, pump station failure, significant wet weather event, natural disaster, or other cause, which shall be specifically identified. If the cause is identified as a blockage, the type of blockage shall be identified, at a minimum, as roots, grease, debris, vandalism, or multiple causes of which each should be identified. If the cause is identified as infrastructure, it
 shall be determined, at a minimum, whether the infrastructure failure was due to leaks, damage to, or breakage of, collection system piping or insufficient capacity. If the cause is identified as a significant wet weather event or natural disaster, the report shall describe both the event and how it resulted in the overflow. If the precise cause cannot be identified after investigation, the report shall include a narrative explanation describing the investigation conducted and providing the information known about the possible causes of the overflow.

(2) An estimate of the volume of the overflow event.

(3) Location of the overflow event. Sufficient information shall be provided to determine location for purposes of GIS mapping, such as specific street address or the latitude and longitude of the event.

(4) Date,
 time, and duration of the overflow event.

(5) Whether or not the overflow reached or may have reached waters of the state.

(6) Whether or not a beach closure occurred or may have occurred as a result of the overflow.

(7) The response and corrective action taken.

(8) Whether or not there is an ongoing investigation, the reasons for it and expected date of completion.

(9) The name, address, and telephone number of the reporting collection system owner or operator and a specific contact name.

(c) Commencing on July 1 of a year in which the Legislature has appropriated sufficient funds for this purpose, in the event of a spill or
 overflow from a sanitary sewer system that is subject to the notification requirements set forth in Section 13271, the applicable collection system owner or operator, in addition to immediate reporting duties pursuant to Section 13271, shall submit to the appropriate regional board, within 30 days of the date of becoming aware of the overflow event, a report using the form described in subdivision (b). The report shall be filed electronically, if possible, or by fax or mail if electronic submission is not possible.

(d) (1) Commencing on July 1 of a year in which the Legislature has appropriated sufficient funds for this purpose, in the event of a spill or overflow from a sanitary sewer system that is not subject to the reporting requirements set forth in Section 13271 that is either found by the State Department of Public Health or any local health officer to result in contamination pursuant to Section 5412 of the Health
 and Safety Code, or is found by the State Department of Public Health to result in pollution or nuisance pursuant to Section 5413 of the Health and Safety Code, the agency making the determination shall submit to the appropriate regional board, within 30 days of making the determination, a report that shall include, at a minimum, the following information:

(A) Date, time, and approximate duration of the overflow event.

(B) An estimate of the volume of the overflow event.

(C) Location of the overflow event.

(D) A description of the response or corrective action taken by the agency making the determination.

(E) The name, address, and telephone number of the reporting collection system owner
 or operator, and a specific contact name.

(2) The report shall be filed electronically, if possible, or by fax or mail if electronic submission is not possible.

(e)Before January 1 of a year in which the Legislature has appropriated sufficient funds for this purpose, the state board, in consultation with representatives of cities, counties, cities and counties, and special districts, public interest groups, the State Department of Public Health, and regional boards, shall develop and maintain a sanitary sewer system overflow database that, at a minimum, contains the parameters described in subdivisions (b) and (d).

(f) Commencing on July 1 of a year in which the Legislature has appropriated sufficient funds for this purpose, each regional board shall coordinate with collection system owners or operators, the State
 Department of Public Health, and local health officers to compile the reports submitted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d). Each regional board shall report that information to the state board on a quarterly basis, to be included in the sanitary sewer system overflow database.

(g)The state board shall make available to the public, by Internet and other cost-effective means, as determined by the state board, information that is generated pursuant to this section. In a year in which the Legislature has appropriated sufficient funds for the purposes described in this subdivision, the state board shall prepare a summary report of the information collected in the sanitary sewer system overflow database, and make it available to the general public through the Internet and other cost-effective means, as determined by the state board. To the extent resources and the data allow, this report shall include GIS maps compiling coastal overflow
 events.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 18.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13193.5.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the State Water Resources Control Board’s Water Quality Control Policy on the Use of Coastal and Estuarine Waters for Power Plant Cooling, as referenced in Section 2922 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations, the final compliance dates for Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2 shall be October 31, 2030. Nothing in this section prevents the state board from ordering the operator of the Diablo Canyon powerplant to conduct any other form of mitigation allowed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 10.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13193.9.

(a) The state board, to the extent permitted by law, shall take all of the following actions for the purpose of allocating funds on behalf of a wastewater collection, treatment, or disposal project, if the recipient of financial assistance is a small, disadvantaged community:

(1) If the state board determines that an advance is needed for the project to proceed in an efficient manner, allocate to the recipient up to 25 percent of the financial assistance amount, not exceeding one million dollars ($1,000,000), in advance of actual expenditures. The recipient shall repay to the state board any funds advanced pursuant to this section, including any interest earned on the advance funds, if the funds are unused upon expiration of the funding agreement or if the funds are not expended in accordance with the financial assistance agreement.

(2) Establish a payment process pursuant to which the recipient of financial assistance receives funds within 30 days of the date on which the state board receives a project payment request unless the state board, within that 30-day period, determines that the project payment would not be in accordance with the terms of the program guidelines.

(3) Utilize wire transfers or other appropriate payment procedures to expedite project payments.

(b) The amount of financial assistance received by a recipient, including any funds advanced pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), shall not exceed the total amount of the financial assistance that the state board agrees to provide for a project. If financial assistance is advanced to a recipient pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the state board shall reduce subsequent disbursements of financial assistance by the amount advanced.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “small disadvantaged community” means a municipality with a population of 20,000 persons or less, or a reasonably isolated and divisible segment of a larger municipality encompassing 20,000 persons or less, with an annual median household income that is less than 80 percent of the statewide annual median household income.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 609, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

13194.

(a) (1) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the state board may provide grants to eligible applicants to be used to provide interim relief to households in which a private water well has gone dry, or has been destroyed, due to drought, wildfire, or other natural disaster. Eligible applicants who receive funds pursuant to this section shall administer and implement that funding consistent with this section.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Eligible applicant” means a county, community water system, local public agency, or nonprofit organization.

(B) “Interim relief” includes, but
 is not limited to, the provision of domestic water storage tanks, hauled water, and bottled water.

(b) The state board may provide up to 10 percent of the funds appropriated for these purposes to eligible applicants for planning related to permanent solutions for private water wells that have gone dry, or been destroyed, due to drought, wildfire, or other natural disaster.

(c) The state board shall not use more than 5 percent of the funds appropriated for these purposes for its administrative costs.

(d) The state board may adopt guidelines to implement this section. Those guidelines are not subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) A contract entered into under this section is
 exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The state board may award a contract under this section on a noncompetitive bid basis as necessary to implement the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 373, Sec. 1.   (SB 513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Electronic Submission of Reports [13195. - 13197.5.]

13195.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Public domain” means a format that may be duplicated, distributed, and used without payment of a royalty or license fee.

(b) “Report” means any document or item that is required for submission in order for a person to comply with a regulation, directive, or order issued by the state board, a regional board, or a local agency pursuant to a program administered by the state board, including, but not limited to, any analysis of material by a laboratory that has accreditation or certification pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 100825) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 727, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13196.

(a) The state board may require a person submitting a report to the state board, a regional board, or a local agency to submit the report in electronic format. The state board may also require that any report submitted in electronic format include the latitude and longitude, accurate to within one meter, of the location where any sample analyzed in the report was collected.

(b) The state board shall adopt a single, standard format for the electronic submission of analytical and environmental compliance data contained in reports. In adopting a standard format, the state board shall only consider formats that meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Are available free of charge.

(2) Are available in the public domain.

(3) Have available public domain means to import, manipulate, and store data.

(4) Allow the importation of data into tables indicating relational distances.

(5) Allow the verification of data submission consistency.

(6) Allow for inclusion of all of the following information:

(A) The physical site address from which the sample was taken, along with any information already required for permitting and reporting unauthorized releases.

(B) Environmental assessment data taken during the initial site investigation phase, as well as the continuing monitoring and evaluation phases.

(C) The latitude and longitude, accurate to within one meter, of the location where any sample was collected.

(D) A description of all tests performed on the sample, the results of that testing, any quality assurance and quality control information, any available narrative information regarding the collection of the sample, and any available information concerning the laboratory’s analysis of the sample.

(7) Fulfill any additional criteria the state board determines appropriate for an effective electronic report submission program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 727, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13197.5.

(a) The state board shall adopt, not later than March 1, 2001, emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code implementing a statewide program for the electronic submission of reports required pursuant to Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code and Article 4 (commencing with Section 25299.36) of Chapter 6.75 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, for those reports that contain soil or water chemistry analysis by a laboratory certified or accredited pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 100825) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) The adoption of any regulations pursuant to this section that are filed with the Office of Administrative Law on or before March 1, 2001, shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare.

(2) (A) Except as specified in subparagraph (B), subdivisions (e) to (h), inclusive, of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code apply to any emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(B) Notwithstanding the 120-day period imposed in subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, the state board shall have one calendar year from the effective date of any emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section to comply with that subdivision.

(c) Regulations adopted pursuant to this section may not require the electronic submission of reports before July 1, 2001, but may require the electronic submission of reports on or after July 1, 2001.

(d) Regulations adopted pursuant to this section may specify either of the following as the required reporting format:

(1) The Geographic Environmental Information Management System format as described in the report submitted to the state board on July 1, 1999, by the Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory, entitled, “Evaluating the Feasibility of a Statewide Geographic Information System.”

(2) The Electronic Deliverable Format (EDF) developed by the United States Army Corps of Engineers, as the same may be revised from time to time. The specification of the EDF as the reporting format shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 13196.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 727, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Drought Relief [13198. - 13198.6.]

13198.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Drought scenario” means either of the following:

(1) Circumstances for which the Governor has issued a proclamation of a state of emergency, pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, based on drought conditions.

(2) (A) Circumstances for which the state board determines, consistent with subparagraph (B), that drought conditions necessitate urgent and immediate action to ensure availability of safe drinking water, to protect public health and safety, or, after consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, to avoid serious and irreparable harm to fish or
 wildlife.

(B) Before determining a drought scenario exists pursuant to subparagraph (A), the state board shall do both of the following:

(i) Provide notice, including specific geographic areas in which a determination of a drought scenario is proposed, to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the secretaries of the implementing agencies, and the Director of Emergency Services.

(ii) To the extent feasible, conduct a public hearing for purposes of seeking public comment on the proposed declaration of a drought scenario, and any proposed actions.

(b) “Implementing agency” means any of the following:

(1) The Natural Resources Agency.

(2) The California Environmental Protection Agency.

(3) The Department of Food and Agriculture.

(4) The California Health and Human Services Agency.

(5) Boards, departments, and offices within the agencies specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

(6) The Office of Emergency Services.

(c) (1) “Interim or immediate relief” means any of the following:

(A) Hauled water.

(B) Temporary community water tanks.

(C) Bottled water.

(D) Water vending machines.

(E) Emergency water interties.

(F) New wells or rehabilitation of existing wells.

(G) Construction or installation of permanent connections to adjacent water systems, recycled water projects that provide immediate relief to potable water supplies, water use reduction and efficiency equipment, and other projects that support immediate drought response.

(H) Fish and wildlife rescue, protection, and relocation.

(I) Education, outreach, direct installation programs, rebate programs, and other activities to increase water conservation.

(J) Drought resilience planning.

(K) Groundwater recharge projects meeting the conditions of Section 1242.1.

(2) Eligible costs for interim or immediate relief include technical assistance, site acquisitions, post-performance monitoring, and costs directly related to the provision of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 36.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13198.2.

(a) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute for these purposes, an implementing agency may make grants and direct expenditures for interim or immediate relief in response to conditions arising from a drought scenario to do any of the following:

(1) Address immediate impacts on human health and safety, including providing or improving availability of food, water, or shelter.

(2) Address immediate impacts on fish and wildlife resources.

(3) Provide water to persons or communities that lose or are threatened with the loss or contamination of water supplies.

(b) A contract entered into under this article by an implementing agency is exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. An implementing agency may award a contract under this section on a noncompetitive bid basis as necessary to implement the purposes of this article.

(c) An implementing agency shall obtain approval from the Department of Finance before entering into a contract under this section.

(d) Actions of implementing agencies under this article shall be deemed to be within paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 21080 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) Posting and dissemination of information related to drought emergency activities under this section is exempt from Sections 7405 and 11546.7 of the Government Code as
 they pertain to the posting of materials on state agency internet websites as part of responding to the emergency, provided that any state agencies failing to satisfy the requirements of Sections 7405 and 11546.7 of the Government Code shall make and post an accessible version on their internet websites as soon as practicable.

(f) Implementing agencies may adopt guidelines to implement this article. Those guidelines are not subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 37.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13198.3.

(a) Actions of any public agency that contracts with the United States Bureau of Reclamation, or is an entitlement holder under the 2006 consolidated decree in Arizona v. California (2006) 547 U.S. 150, for Colorado River water supplies, approved before December 31, 2026, that the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency concurs in writing are reasonably necessary to implement Colorado River water conservation agreements with the United States Bureau of Reclamation, as well as those water conservation agreements themselves, shall be deemed to be within the activities described in paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 21080 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Actions under this section shall not include the construction of new
 canals or major new infrastructure, but may include infrastructure improvements such as, without limitation, the installation of more efficient irrigation systems or the lining of canals, and shall be limited to projects that reduce or make more efficient the use or distribution of Colorado River water and shall not include projects that develop replacement water supplies.

(c) (1) The Natural Resources Agency shall promptly post any concurrences under this section on its internet website and shall annually report any such concurrences to the Legislature.

(2) The report required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) This section does not waive or suspend any other permitting requirements applicable to the public agency actions
 described herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 38.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13198.4.

(a) This section applies and is subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute to an implementing agency to provide grants and direct expenditures for interim or immediate relief to drought scenarios.

(b) An implementing agency may provide grant funds and direct expenditures to or on behalf of affected public and private entities to provide interim or immediate relief.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 11019 of the Government Code, an implementing agency may provide advance payment of up to 25 percent of grant funds awarded to public agencies, nonprofit organizations, public utilities, mobilehome parks, mutual water companies, farmers and ranchers,
 federally recognized California Native American tribes, nonfederally recognized Native American tribes on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission for the purposes of Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 2004, administrators, and groundwater sustainability agencies that have demonstrated cashflow problems according to the satisfaction of the implementing agency.

(d) An implementing agency may authorize funding of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) without a written agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 97.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13198.6.

(a) This article does not limit, alter, or expand any provision of the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) This article does not expand or alter the authority of an implementing agency to take regulatory action other than the actions explicitly described in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 97.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Regional Water Quality Control [13200. - 13286.9.]



  ARTICLE 1. Organization and Membership of Regional Boards [13200. - 13208.]

13200.

The state is divided, for the purpose of this division, into nine regions:

(a) North Coast region, which comprises all basins including Lower Klamath Lake and Lost River Basins draining into the Pacific Ocean from the California-Oregon state line southerly to the southerly boundary of the watershed of Estero de San Antonio and Stemple Creek in Marin and Sonoma Counties.

(b) San Francisco Bay region, which comprises San Francisco Bay, Suisun Bay, from Sacramento River and San Joaquin River westerly from a line which passes between Collinsville and
 Montezuma Island and follows thence the boundary common to Sacramento and Solano Counties and that common to Sacramento and Contra Costa Counties to the westerly boundary of the watershed of Markley Canyon in Contra Costa County, all basins draining into the bays and rivers westerly from this line, and all basins draining into the Pacific Ocean between the southerly boundary of the north coastal region and the southerly boundary of the watershed of Pescadero Creek in San Mateo and Santa Cruz Counties.

(c) Central Coast region, which comprises all basins, including Carrizo Plain in San Luis Obispo and Kern Counties, draining into the Pacific Ocean from the southerly boundary of the watershed of Pescadero Creek in San Mateo and Santa Cruz Counties to the southeasterly boundary, located in the westerly part of Ventura County, of the watershed of Rincon Creek.

(d) Los Angeles region,
 which comprises all basins draining into the Pacific Ocean between the southeasterly boundary, located in the westerly part of Ventura County, of the watershed of Rincon Creek and a line which coincides with the southeasterly boundary of Los Angeles County from the ocean to San Antonio Peak and follows thence the divide between San Gabriel River and Lytle Creek drainages to the divide between Sheep Creek and San Gabriel River drainages.

(e) Santa Ana region, which comprises all basins draining into the Pacific Ocean between the southeasterly boundary of the Los Angeles region and a line which follows the drainage divide between Muddy and Moro Canyons from the ocean to the summit of San Joaquin Hills; thence along the divide between lands draining into Newport Bay and into Laguna Canyon to Niguel Road; thence along Niguel Road and Los Aliso Avenue to the divide between Newport Bay and Aliso Creek drainages; thence along that divide and the
 southeasterly boundary of the Santa Ana River drainage to the divide between Baldwin Lake and Mojave Desert drainages; thence along that divide to the divide between Pacific Ocean and Mojave Desert drainages.

(f) San Diego region, which comprises all basins draining into the Pacific Ocean between the southern boundary of the Santa Ana region and the California-Mexico boundary.

(g) Central Valley region, which comprises all basins including Goose Lake Basin draining into the Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers to the easterly boundary of the San Francisco Bay region near Collinsville. The Central Valley region shall have section offices in the Sacramento Valley and the San Joaquin Valley.

(h) Lahontan region, which comprises all basins east of the Santa Ana, Los Angeles and Central Valley regions from the
 California-Oregon boundary to the southerly boundary located in Los Angeles and San Bernardino Counties of the watersheds draining into Antelope Valley, Mojave River Basin and Dry Lake Basin near Ivanpah.

(i) Colorado River Basin region, which comprises all basins east of the Santa Ana and San Diego regions draining into the Colorado River, Salton Sea and local sinks from the southerly boundary of the Lahontan region to the California-Mexico boundary.

The regions defined and described in this section shall be as precisely delineated on official maps of the department and include all of the areas within the boundaries of the state.

For purposes of this section the boundaries of the state extend three nautical miles into the Pacific Ocean from the line of mean lower low water marking the seaward limits of inland waters and three nautical miles from the line of
 mean lower low water on the mainland and each offshore island.

Nothing in this section shall limit the power conferred by this chapter to regulate the disposal of waste into ocean waters beyond the boundaries of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13201.

(a) There is a regional board for each of the regions described in Section 13200. Each board shall consist of seven members appointed by the Governor, each of whom shall represent, and act on behalf of, all the people and shall reside or have a principal place of business within the region.

(b) Except as specified in subdivision (c), each
 member shall be appointed on the basis of his or her demonstrated interest or proven ability in the field of water quality, including water pollution control, water resource management, water use, or water protection. The Governor shall consider appointments from the public and nonpublic sectors. In regard to appointments from the nonpublic sector, the Governor shall consider including members from key economic sectors in a given region, such as agriculture, industry, commercial activities, forestry, and fisheries.

(c) At least one member shall be appointed as a public member who is not required to meet the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) All persons appointed to a regional board shall be subject to Senate confirmation, but shall not be required to appear before any committee of the Senate for purposes of such confirmation unless specifically requested to
 appear by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(e) Insofar as practicable, appointments shall be made in such manner as to result in representation on the board from all parts of the region.

(f) Insofar as practicable, appointments shall be made in a manner as to result in representation on the board from diverse experiential backgrounds.

(g) Each member shall be appointed on the basis of his or her ability to attend substantially all meetings of the board and to actively discharge all duties and responsibilities of a member of the board.

(h) The reduction in the number of members of each regional board required by the act that added this subdivision shall be achieved according to the ordinary expiration of the terms of incumbents and other vacancies.
 Notwithstanding Section 13202 the Governor shall not fill a vacancy on any regional board until the number of members serving on that regional board falls below seven members. When the numbers of members serving on the regional board falls below seven members, the Governor shall appoint or reappoint individuals pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 117.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13202.

(a) Each member of a regional board shall be appointed for a term of four years. Vacancies shall be immediately filled by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the terms in which they occur.

(b) The term of office for members of each regional board shall be staggered and shall expire in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Two members on September 30, 2013, and every four years thereafter.

(2) Two members on September 30, 2014, and every four years thereafter.

(3) Two members on September 30, 2015, and every four years thereafter.

(4) One member on September 30, 2016, and every four years thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 118.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13203.

The official designation of each regional board shall be: California Regional Water Quality Control Board, (region name).

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13204.

Each regional board shall hold at least six regular meetings each calendar year and the additional special meetings or hearings as shall be called by the chairperson or any two members of the regional board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 19.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13205.

Each member of a regional board shall receive two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each day during which that member is engaged in the performance of official duties. The performance of official duties includes, but is not limited to, reviewing agenda materials for no more than one day in preparation for each regional board meeting. The total compensation received by members of all of the regional boards shall not exceed, in any one fiscal year, the sum of three hundred seventy-eight thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($378,250). A member may decline compensation. In addition to the compensation, each member shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 47.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13206.

Public officers associated with any area of government, including planning or water, and whether elected or appointed, may be appointed to, and may serve contemporaneously as members of, a regional board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 622.)
-------------------------------------------

13207.

(a) A member of a regional board shall not participate in any board action pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 13260) of this chapter, or Article 1 (commencing with Section 13300) of Chapter 5, in which he or she has a disqualifying financial interest in the decision within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(b) A
 board member shall not participate in any proceeding before any regional board or the state board as a consultant or in any other capacity on behalf of any waste discharger.

(c) Upon the request of any person, or on the Attorney General’s own initiative, the Attorney General may file a complaint in the superior court for the county in which the regional board has its principal office alleging that a board member has knowingly violated this section and the facts upon which the allegation is based and asking that the member be removed from office. Further proceedings shall be in accordance as near as may be with rules governing civil actions. If after trial the court finds that the board member has knowingly violated this section it shall pronounce judgment that the member be removed from office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 119.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13208.

(a) No regional board executive officer may make, participate in making, or use his or her official position to influence, any decision of the regional board, or made on behalf of the regional board, affecting any person or entity subject to waste discharge requirements under this division if the regional board executive officer has received, during the previous two years, 10 percent or more of his or her income from that person or entity.

(b) “Income,” for purposes of this
 section, has the same meaning as in Section 82030 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 773, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions Relating to Powers and Duties of Regional Boards [13220. - 13228.15.]

13220.

Each regional board shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish an office.

(b) Select one of its members as chairperson at the first regular meeting held each year.

(c) Appoint as its confidential employee, who may be exempt from civil service under Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution, and fix the salary of, an executive officer who shall meet technical qualifications as defined by the state board. The executive officer shall serve at the pleasure of the regional board.

(d) Employ any other
 assistants that may be determined necessary to assist the executive officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 20.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13221.

Members of the regional board shall be empowered to administer oaths and issue subpoenas for the attendance and giving of testimony by witnesses and for the production of evidence in any proceeding before the board in any part of the region. The provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1075) of Part I of Division 2 of this code shall apply to regional boards within their own regions, where they shall have the same power as the state board within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13222.

Pursuant to such guidelines as the state board may establish, each regional board shall adopt regulations to carry out its powers and duties under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13223.

(a) Each regional board may delegate any of its powers and duties vested in it by this division to its executive officer excepting only the following: (1) the promulgation of any regulation; (2) the issuance, modification, or revocation of any water quality control plan, water quality objectives, or waste discharge requirement; (3) the issuance, modification, or revocation of any cease and desist order; (4) the holding of any hearing on water quality control plans; and (5) the application to the Attorney General for judicial enforcement but excluding cases of specific delegation in a cease and desist order and excluding the cases described in subdivision (c) of Section 13002 and Sections 13304 and 13340.

(b) Whenever any reference is made in this division to any action that may be taken by a regional board, such reference includes such action by its executive officer pursuant to powers and duties delegated to him by the regional board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

13224.

Each regional board may issue policy statements relating to any water quality matter within its jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13225.